Arkansas, session 2025, SB463.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 1, Subchapter 18, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-18-111. Closure of electric generation unit or transmission asset
by settlement agreement — Notice and commission approval required.
(a)(1) A public utility shall file an application with the Arkansas
Public Service Commission seeking approval of a settlement agreement proposed
between the United States Government, an agency of the United States, or any
other third party if the purpose of all or part of the settlement agreement
is the closure, deactivation, or decommissioning of an electric generation
unit or a transmission asset located in this state.
*ANS189*
03/14/2025 10:34:03 AM ANS189

SB463
(2) As used in this section, "settlement agreement" includes a
consent decree that is being proposed in a formal judicial proceeding.
(b) The application required under subsection (a) of this section
shall include:
(1) The terms and conditions of the proposed settlement
agreement; and
(2) An acknowledgement that the public utility shall not enter
into the settlement agreement until the commission approves the proposed
settlement agreement.
(c) The commission shall approve or deny a proposed settlement
agreement submitted under subdivision (a)(1) of this section using the
following standards and procedures:
(1) Upon receipt of a proposed settlement agreement and if
requested by the public utility, the commission shall implement reasonable
and appropriate procedures to protect confidential and proprietary
information, but the reasonable and appropriate procedures shall not prevent
the commission or the public from accessing information sufficient to
evaluate compliance with the standards under this section;
(2) The commission shall request testimony or other legal
pleadings from the Office of the Attorney General, including the staff
assigned to the Consumer Utilities Rate Advocacy Division, and other agencies
of the state with expertise in the legal issues giving rise to the proposed
settlement agreement to assist in the commission’s evaluation of:
(A) Compliance with the standards under this section; and
(B) Any underlying legal issues proposed for resolution in
the settlement agreement; and
(3)(A) After testimony and legal pleadings filed as described in
subdivision (c)(2) of this section, in order to approve the proposed
settlement agreement, the commission shall determine that there is clear and
convincing evidence that:
(i) The legal claims being resolved in the proposed
settlement agreement are based on a reasonable interpretation of existing
law;
(ii) The proposed settlement agreement does not
commit the public utility to an action that exceeds regulations at a cost to
consumers, including without limitation an action the commission finds to be
03/14/2025 10:34:03 AM ANS189

SB463
driven by shareholder or a shareholder equivalent, environmental, or
sustainability goals rather than applicable state or federal law; and
(iii) The public utility’s decision to enter into
the proposed settlement agreement is reasonable and prudent.
(B)(i) Clear and convincing evidence shall include without
limitation the production of contemporaneous documentation and other evidence
by the public utility supporting the prudence of the public utility’s
decision making.
(ii) In the absence of the contemporaneous
documentation or other evidence required under subdivision (c)(3)(B)(i) of
this section, the public utility may obtain an independent, retrospective
analysis demonstrating that the public utility's actual decision to enter
into the settlement agreement is a reasonable and prudent course of action.
(d) This subchapter does not apply to any settlement, consent decree,
or other resolution of any litigation or legal proceeding executed or ordered
before the effective date of this act.




















03/14/2025 10:34:03 AM ANS189